Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-507
Attorney General, county attorneys; duty to enforce sections.

It shall be the duty of the county attorneys, in their counties, and the Attorney General to enforce the provisions of sections 59-501 to 59-508.

Laws 1939, c. 77, § 4, p. 315;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 59-526;

R.S.1943, § 59-507.